Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB212.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 258.005 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 258.005 to 258.087, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Dog" means any canine three (3) months of age or older for which there exists a United States Department of
Agriculture approved rabies vaccine;
(2) "Owner" means any person owning, keeping, or harboring a dog, cat, or ferret in Kentucky;
(3) "Veterinarian" has the same meaning as in KRS 321.181[means a licensed practitioner of veterinary
medicine];
(4) "Qualified person" means a person granted a permit by the secretary for health and family services to vaccinate
his or her own dog against rabies;
(5) "Vaccination" means the administration by a veterinarian, veterinary technician, or other qualified person of
rabies vaccine approved by and administered in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by
the secretary for health and family services;
(6) "Cat" means any feline three (3) months of age or older for which there exists a United States Department of
Agriculture approved rabies vaccine;
(7) "Animal control officer" means an individual who is employed or appointed by, or has contracted with:
(a) A city, county, urban-county government, charter county, or consolidated local government to enforce
the provisions of this chapter, the provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes relating to cruelty,
mistreatment, sexual crimes against, or torture of animals, and local animal control ordinances; or
(b) An entity that has contracted with a city, county, urban-county government, charter county, or
consolidated local government to enforce the provisions of this chapter, the provisions of the Kentucky
Revised Statutes relating to cruelty, mistreatment, sexual crimes against, or torture of animals, and local
animal control ordinances;
(8) "Ferret" means any musteline three (3) months of age or older for which there exists a United States
Department of Agriculture approved rabies vaccine;[ and]
(9) "Quarantine" means the confinement of an animal for observation of clinical signs of illness indicating rabies
infection, and the prevention of escape or contact with any person or other animal; and
(10) "Veterinary technician" means a "veterinary technician" as that term is defined in KRS 321.181, who is
under the direct supervision of a veterinarian who is located on the premises of the facility.
Section 2. KRS 258.015 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Every owner shall have his or her dog, cat, or ferret initially vaccinated against rabies by the age of four (4)
months and revaccinated at the expiration of the immunization period as certified by a Kentucky-licensed[the]
veterinarian. The veterinarian, or a Kentucky-licensed veterinary technician in accordance to KRS 321.190,
who vaccinates a dog, cat, or ferret shall issue to the owner a vaccination certificate signed by the veterinarian
or signed by both the administering veterinary technician and the supervising veterinarian on a form
approved by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services. The vaccination certificate shall be prepared and
issued in duplicate, one (1) copy to be retained by the issuing veterinarian and one (1) copy to be given to the
owner of the dog, cat, or ferret vaccinated. Each certificate shall bear the name and address of the veterinarian
who issued it. The veterinarian shall also furnish each dog owner with a rabies tag bearing a serial number
corresponding to the vaccination certificate with the year of immunization. The tag shall be affixed to a collar
or harness furnished by the owner and shall be worn by the dog for which the tag was issued. No one except
the owner or his or her duly authorized agent shall remove the tag.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(2) Every qualified person who vaccinates his or her own dog shall comply with the vaccination certificate and
tag requirement provisions of subsection (1) of this section and the administrative regulations promulgated
under KRS 258.075.
(3) Every owner of a cat or ferret shall show proof of a valid rabies vaccination upon request of an animal control
officer or peace officer.
Signed by Governor April 13, 2026.